Hawaii, session 2025, GM1246.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that extending the
deadlines for the administrative driver's license revocation
office to issue its initial decision, regarding whether to
revoke the driver's license of an individual suspected of
operating a vehicle under the influence of an intoxicant, is in
the best interests of public health, safety, and welfare.
Each year, hundreds of people across Hawaii are injured and
dozens are killed in motor vehicle collisions involving a driver
who tests positive for drugs or alcohol. Effective law
enforcement can help to deter would-be offenders from operating
a vehicle under the influence of an intoxicant, and part of that
enforcement effort includes testing any breath or blood samples
provided by drivers suspected of operating a vehicle under the
influence of an intoxicant. Aside from criminal cases, these
test results, if obtained within the time period set by statute,
may also be used by the administrative driver's license
revocation office to potentially revoke the person's driver's
2025-2855 SB597 GDI SMA.docx
llllllillllllHIIIfflnUIIIIH

Page 2 S.B. NO.
^0^
license. The sooner the administrative driver's license
revocation office can issue its initial decision regarding a
potential license revocation, the sooner those individuals can
be kept off the road or required to install an ignition
S interlock device if they wish to continue driving.
The legislature acknowledges that while it is certainly
important for the administrative driver's license revocation
office to issue these decisions quickly, Hawaii is one of the
few states that has a statutory deadline for decisions to be
issued. Of those states that do have a deadline set by statute,
the deadlines appear to be significantly longer than Hawaii's
deadline. Oregon, for example, requires their administrative
driver's license revocation office to issue decisions within
thirty days from arrest, or sixty days from the time positive
IS blood test results are received. Notably, Oregon has in-state
labs that can test blood for the presence of drugs, while Hawaii
does not.
The legislature further finds that a 2024 nationwide survey
of toxicology laboratories, conducted by The Center for Forensic
Science Research & Education, found that fifty per cent of the
labs reported testing for alcohol within fifteen days or less.
2025-2855 SB597 CDl SMA.docx

Page 3
S.B. NO.
while only fourteen per cent complete their testing in under six
days. When testing for drugs other than alcohol, the timeframe
varies greatly. Thirty-two per cent of labs reported testing in
thirty days or less, while another thirty-two per cent complete
their testing within thirty-one to sixty days. Only fourteen
per cent reported testing for drugs within twenty days or less.
These timeframes do not include the time needed for a specimen
to be shipped to the lab, which is an additional factor for law
enforcement agencies in Hawaii, especially those in the counties
of Maui, Kauai, and Hawaii who need to ship all of their blood
and urine specimens to Honolulu. Any specimens to be tested for
drugs are then shipped from Honolulu to the continental United
States.
The legislature concludes that establishing more reasonable
deadlines for the administrative driver's license revocation
office to issue its decisions, which account for technological
realities and align with national timeframes for testing
specimens for drugs and alcohol, would enable the administrative
driver's license revocation office to issue decisions that are
based on physical evidence, resulting in more just and reliable
outcomes.
2025-2855 SB597 CDl SMA.docx 3
iiHiiiiinwnMiiiiiiiiii

Page 4 S.B. NO. 25.2
Therefore, the purpose of this Act is to extend the written
review decision deadline for the issuance of a notice of
administrative revocation of a license to operate a vehicle.
SECTION 2. Section 291E-37, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows:
" (a) The director [autreffta-tiediiy] shall automatically
review the issuance of a notice of administrative revocation and
shall issue a written decision administratively revoking the
license and privilege to operate a vehicle or rescinding the
notice of administrative revocation. The written review
decision shall be mailed to the respondent, or to the parent or
guardian of the respondent if the respondent is under the age of
eighteen, no later than:
(1) [Birght-] Fourteen days after the date the notice was
issued in a case involving an alcohol related offense;
or
(2) [T-wcnty-two] Twenty-eight days after the date the
notice was issued in a case involving a drug related
offense."
SECTION 3. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
2025-2855 SB597 CDl SMA.docx <

Page 5
S.B. NO.
SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2025-2855 SB597 CDl SMA.docx
lllllimiNIIIIIIIIIIHMII

S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 30th day of May , 2025
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAI‘1

S.B.No. 597, H.D. 2, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAPI
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2025.
Clerk of the Senate
101

SB No. 597, HD 2, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of2025.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives